Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.325

Actions or claims arising from construction defect claims—Statute tolled.

If a written notice of claim is served under RCW 64.50.020 within the time prescribed for the filing of an action under this chapter, the statutes of limitations for construction-related claims are tolled until sixty days after the period of time during which the filing of an action is barred under RCW 64.50.020.

[ 2002 c 323 s 8.]